Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5067.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 40103. (1) "Game" means any species of wildlife designated by the legislature or the commission as game under section 40110 and any of the following animals but does not include privately owned cervidae species located on a cervidae livestock facility registered under the privately owned cervidae producers marketing act, 2000 PA 190, MCL 287.951 to 287.969: (a) Badger. (b) Bear. (c) Beaver. (d) Bobcat. (e) Brant. (f) Coot. (g) Coyote. (h) Crow. (i) Deer. (j) Duck. (k) Elk. (l) Fisher. (m) Florida gallinule. (n) Fox. (o) Geese. (p) Hare. (q) Hungarian partridge. (r) Marten. (s) Mink. (t) Moose. (u) Muskrat. (v) Opossum. (w) Otter. (x) Pheasant. (y) Quail. (z) Rabbit. (aa) Raccoon. (bb) Ruffed grouse. (cc) Sandhill crane. (dd) (cc) Sharptailed grouse. (ee) (dd) Skunk. (ff) (ee) Snipe. (gg) (ff) Sora rail. (hh) (gg) Squirrel. (ii) (hh) Virginia rail. (jj) (ii) Weasel. (kk) (jj) Wild turkey. (ll) (kk) Wolf. (mm) (ll) Woodchuck. (nn) (mm) Woodcock. (2) "Interim order of the department" means an order of the department issued under section 40108. (3) "Kind" means an animal's sex, age, or physical characteristics. (4) "Normal agricultural practices" means generally accepted agricultural and management practices as defined by the commission of agriculture and rural development. (5) "Open season" means the dates during which game may be legally taken. (6) "Parts" means any or all portions of an animal, including the skin, plumage, hide, fur, entire body, or egg of an animal. (7) "Protected" or "protected animal" means an animal or kind of animal that is designated by the department as an animal that shall not be taken. (8) "Residence" means a permanent building serving as a temporary or permanent home. Residence may include a cottage, cabin, or mobile home, but does not include a structure designed primarily for taking game, a tree blind, a tent, a recreational or other vehicle, or a camper. (9) "Conservation" means the wise use of natural resources. Sec. 40110c. The legislature authorizes the establishment of an open season for sandhill cranes. Not later than April 1, 2026, the commission shall issue orders under section 40113a establishing an open season for sandhill cranes.